North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-02 Construction [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 28]

48-02-01.
Definition of governing board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-02.
Prerequisite to building and repair by contract — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-03.
Method used in securing bids — Emergency waiver. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-04.
Contents of advertisement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-05.
Plans and specifications — Place of filing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-05.1.
Bid requirements and acceptance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-06.
Opening bids — Award of contract — Bond required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-06.1.
Public contract to contain a fuel cost line item and a fuel cost adjustment clause. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-06.2.
Bonds from contractors for public improvements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-07.
Allowance and payment of estimates — Investment of retainage. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-08.
Estimate — Failure to certify — Rate of interest. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-09.
Appropriations not to be diverted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-10.
Material produced in state given preference for use in public buildings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-10.1.
Advertising for bids. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-10.2.
Opening bids, award of contracts, preference for native products. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-10.3.
Violations — Remedy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-11.
Specified brands, marks, names, or patented articles not to be specified. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-12.
Officers must not be interested in contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-13.
Architects and engineers — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-14.
Retention of money on public contracts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-15.
Claim for work or improvement — Suit on contractor’s bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-16.
Contents of notice to subcontractors — Number of publications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-17.
Claims — When barred as liens against contractor and surety. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-18.
Statement of legislative intent on design of public buildings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-19.
Public buildings and facilities — Statement of compliance with accessibility guidelines. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-20.
Authorization of expansion of building projects by legislative assembly or budget section. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1033, ch. § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-02-21.
Public buildings — Directed surety bonds prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1033, ch. § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter ch. 403, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.